Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,316
Bicycles; clinging to vehicles; prohibited.

Any person who rides upon any bicycle shall not attach himself, herself, or the bicycle to any vehicle upon a roadway.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 89;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-689;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 412.